District of Columbia statutes.
32-705

District government employees — Domestic partnership and family member benefits.

(a)

A District government employee shall be granted sick leave when needed to care for a family member as defined in § 32-701(7), subject to the same guidelines and restrictions in § 32-502.

(b)

A District government employee shall be granted sick leave to care for a minor child of either domestic partner or to care for the employee’s domestic partner who is on maternity or paternity leave, subject to the same guidelines and restrictions in § 32-502.

(c)

A District government employee shall be granted funeral leave or annual leave when needed to make arrangements for or attend a funeral or memorial service for a family member as defined in § 32-701(7), subject to the same guidelines and restrictions in § 1-612.03(n).

(d)

A District government employee who is adopting or whose domestic partner is adopting a child shall be granted annual leave or leave without pay to make necessary family arrangements, subject to the same guidelines and restrictions in § 32-502.

History

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-114, § 6, 39 DCR 2861

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-702.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1405.